Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 1 Division of Gaming and Athletics Licensing

41-1-1.
Division of gaming and athletics licensing — Duties.

Within the department of business regulation there shall be a division of gaming and athletics licensing. The division shall supervise the enforcement of all laws relating to the regulation and control of racing and athletics, and may in the first instance make decisions and issue orders, subject to appeal to the racing and athletics hearing board. The division shall exercise all powers and duties prescribed by chapters 3, 3.1, 4, 5, 7, and 11 of this title, and all other acts relative to the regulation and supervision of horse racing, dog racing, and athletics, heretofore performed by the commission on horse racing and athletics. The division shall comply with §

42-14-14

in the conduct of any investigation related to any license application, permit and/or registration related to chapters 3, 3.1, 4, 7, and 11 of this title. The division may comply with §

42-14-14

in the conduct of any investigation related to any license application, permit and/or registration related to chapters 5 and 5.2 of this title. The investigation shall require the applicant to apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the Rhode Island state police or the Rhode Island department of the attorney general for a nationwide criminal records check with fingerprinting. The applicant shall be responsible for payment of the costs of the criminal records check. The Rhode Island state police or the Rhode Island department of the attorney general, as applicable, shall send the results of the criminal records check to the division. Once the results are sent to and received by the Rhode Island lottery, the Rhode Island state police and the Rhode Island department of attorney general shall promptly destroy the fingerprint record(s). On or before February 1, 2011, the agency shall adopt rules and regulations establishing criteria to be used in determining whether, based upon a criminal records check, an application will be approved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 25, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 252, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 2.

41-1-2.
Collection of and accounting for racing taxes.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall exercise all the powers and duties prescribed by chapters 3, 3.1, and 4 of this title, and all subsequent acts in amendment thereof and in addition thereto, relating to the collection of and accounting for racing taxes and fees heretofore performed by the commission on horse racing and athletics.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 25, § 2.

41-1-3.
Construction of references — Continuity of functions.

Whenever in any general or public law, and more particularly in this title, the words “commission on horse racing and athletics,” or the word “commission” in reference to the commission, shall appear, the words shall be deemed to refer to and mean the division of gaming and athletics licensing in the department of business regulation. The division shall be deemed and held to constitute a continuation of the former commission on horse racing and athletics. The governor is authorized to transfer or reallocate by executive order the whole, or any part of, the appropriation of the former commission on horse racing and athletics to the department and the division.

Whenever in any general law or public law the words “division of racing and athletics” shall appear, the words shall be deemed to mean the division of gaming and athletics licensing in the department of business regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 25, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 2.